Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB75.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "primary supervising physician" in section 2 of the act of October 5, 1978 (P.L.1109, No.261), known as the Osteopathic Medical Practice Act, is amended to read:Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Primary supervising physician." An osteopathic physician 1234567891011121314151617 who is [registered] licensed with the board or a medical doctor who is licensed with the State Board of Medicine and is designated in a written agreement with a physician assistant under section 10(g) as having primary responsibility for supervising the physician assistant.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 180 days.20250HB0075PN3514 - 2 - <--1234567